North Carolina, session 2025, HB231.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 90B of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article 1 to be titled the "Social Worker Certification and Licensure Act." The following statutes
constitute the new Article 1: G.S. 90B-1, 90B-2, 90B-3, 90B-4, 90B-5, 90B-6, 90B-6.1, 90B-6.2,
90B-7, 90B-8, 90B-9, 90B-9.1, 90B-10, 90B-11, 90B-12, 90B-13, 90B-14, 90B-15, and 90B-16.
SECTION 1.(b) Chapter 90B of the General Statutes is retitled as "Social Worker
Certification and Licensure."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 90B-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90B-1. Short title.
This Chapter Article shall be known as the "Social Worker Certification and Licensure Act.""
SECTION 2. Chapter 90B of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 2.
"Social Work Licensure Compact.
"§ 90B-20. Purpose.
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of regulated social workers by
improving public access to social work services. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority
of states to protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure. This
Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) Increase public access to social work services.
(2) Reduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements associated with
holding multiple licenses.
(3) Enhance the member states' ability to protect the public's health and safety.
(4) Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate practice.
(5) Promote mobility and address workforce shortages by eliminating the
necessity for licenses in multiple states by providing for the mutual
recognition of other member state licenses.
(6) Support military families.
(7) Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary information among
member states.
(8) Authorize all member states to hold a regulated social worker accountable for
abiding by the member state's laws, regulations, and applicable professional
standards in the member state in which the client is located at the time care is
rendered.
(9) Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to social work
services.
"§ 90B-21. Definitions.
*H231-v-4*

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall
apply:
(1) Active military member. – Any individual in full-time duty status in the active
Armed Forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve.
(2) Adverse action. – Any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action
permitted by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other
authority against a regulated social worker, including actions against an
individual's license or multistate authorization to practice such as revocation,
suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's
practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a regulated social
worker's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist
action.
(3) Alternative program. – A nondisciplinary monitoring process or practice
remediation process approved by a licensing authority to address practitioners
with an impairment.
(4) Charter member states. – Member states who have enacted legislation to adopt
this Compact where such legislation predates the effective date of this
Compact, as defined in this Article.
(5) Compact Commission or Commission. – The government agency whose
membership consists of all states that have enacted this Compact which is
known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission, as defined in this
Article, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
(6) Current significant investigative information. – Investigative information that
(i) a licensing authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification
and an opportunity for the regulated social worker to respond has reason to
believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction, as may be defined by the Commission, or (ii) indicates that the
regulated social worker represents an immediate threat to public health and
safety, as may be defined by the Commission, regardless of whether the
regulated social worker has been notified and has had an opportunity to
respond.
(7) Data system. – A repository of information about licensees, including, but not
limited to, continuing education, examination, licensure, current significant
investigative information, disqualifying events, multistate license or licenses,
and adverse action information or other information as required by the
Commission.
(8) Domicile. – The jurisdiction in which the licensee resides and intends to
remain indefinitely.
(9) Disqualifying event. – Any adverse action or incident which results in an
encumbrance that disqualifies or makes the licensee ineligible to either obtain,
retain, or renew a multistate license.
(10) Encumbrance. – A revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full
and unrestricted practice of social work licensed and regulated by a licensing
authority.
(11) Executive Committee. – A group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Compact and
Commission.
(12) Home state. – The member state that is the licensee's primary state of domicile.
(13) Impairment. – A condition that may impair a practitioner's ability to engage
in full and unrestricted practice as a regulated social worker without some type
Page 2 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

of intervention and may include, but is not limited to, alcohol and drug
dependence, mental health impairment, and neurological or physical
impairments.
(14) Licensee. – An individual who currently holds a license from the state to
practice as a regulated social worker.
(15) Licensing authority. – The board or agency of a member state, or equivalent,
that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of regulated social workers.
(16) Member state. – A state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States of America that has enacted this Compact.
(17) Multistate authorization to practice. – A legally authorized privilege to
practice, which is equivalent to a license, associated with a multistate license
permitting the practice of social work in a remote state.
(18) Multistate license. – A license to practice as a regulated social worker issued
by a home state licensing authority that authorizes the regulated social worker
to practice in all member states under multistate authorization to practice.
(19) Qualifying national exam. – A national licensing examination approved by the
Commission.
(20) Regulated social worker. – Any clinical, master's, or bachelor's social worker
licensed by a member state regardless of the title used by that member state.
(21) Remote state. – A member state other than the licensee's home state.
(22) Rule(s) or rule(s) of the Commission. – A regulation or regulations
promulgated by the Commission, as authorized by the Compact, that has the
force of law.
(23) Single-state license. – A social work license issued by any state that authorizes
practice only within the issuing state and does not include multistate
authorization to practice in any member state.
(24) Social work or social work services. – The application of social work theory,
knowledge, methods, ethics, and the professional use of self to restore or
enhance social, psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals,
couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities through the care
and services provided by a regulated social worker as set forth in the member
state's statutes and regulations in the state where the services are being
provided.
(25) State. – Any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of
America that regulates the practice of social work.
(26) Unencumbered license. – A license that authorizes a regulated social worker
to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of social work.
"§ 90B-22. State participation in Compact.
(a) To be eligible to participate in the Compact, a potential member state must currently
meet all of the following criteria:
(1) License and regulate the practice of social work at either the clinical, master's,
or bachelor's category.
(2) Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a program that (i)
corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined in G.S. 90B-23, (ii) is operated
by a college or university recognized by the licensing authority, and (iii) is
accredited, or in candidacy by an institution that subsequently becomes
accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by either of the following:
a. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its successor.
b. The United States Department of Education.
(3) Require applicants for clinical licensure to complete a period of supervised
practice.
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 3

(4) Have a mechanism in place for receiving, investigating, and adjudicating
complaints about licensees.
(b) To maintain membership in the Compact, a member state shall meet all of the
following:
(1) Require applicants for a multistate license pass a qualifying national exam for
the corresponding category of multistate license sought as outlined in
G.S. 90B-23.
(2) Participate fully in the Commission's data system, including using the
Commission's unique identifier as defined in rules.
(3) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and
rules, of any adverse action or the availability of current significant
investigative information regarding a licensee.
(4) Implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of
applicants for a multistate license. Such procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants
for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining that state's criminal records.
(5) Comply with the Rules of the Commission.
(6) Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the home state and meet
the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as
all other applicable home state laws.
(7) Authorize a licensee holding a multistate license in any member state to
practice in accordance with the terms of the Compact and Rules of the
Commission.
(8) Designate a delegate to participate in the Commission meetings.
(c) A member state meeting the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section of
this Compact shall designate the categories of social work licensure that are eligible for issuance
of a multistate license for applicants in such member state. To the extent that any member state
does not meet the requirements for participation in the Compact at any particular category of
social work licensure, such member state may choose, but is not obligated, to issue a multistate
license to applicants that otherwise meet the requirements of G.S. 90B-23 for issuance of a
multistate license in such category or categories of licensure.
(d) The home state may charge a fee for granting the multistate license.
"§ 90B-23. Social worker participation in the Compact.
(a) To be eligible for a multistate license under the terms and provisions of the Compact,
an applicant, regardless of category, must do all of the following:
(1) Hold or be eligible for an active, unencumbered license in the home state.
(2) Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the multistate license.
(3) Submit, in connection with an application for a multistate license, fingerprints
or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record
information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency
responsible for retaining that state's criminal records.
(4) Notify the home state of any adverse action, encumbrance, or restriction on
any professional license taken by any member state or non-member state
within 30 days from the date the action is taken.
(5) Meet any continuing competence requirements established by the home state.
(6) Abide by the laws, regulations, and applicable standards in the member state
where the client is located at the time care is rendered.
(b) An applicant for a clinical-category multistate license must meet all of the following
requirements:
Page 4 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

(1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by either of the
following:
a. Passage of a clinical category qualifying national exam.
b. Licensure of the applicant in their home state at the clinical category,
beginning prior to such time as a qualifying national exam was
required by the home state and accompanied by a period of continuous
social work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed
by the rules of the Commission.
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by rule.
(2) Attain at least a master's degree in social work from a program that is both of
the following:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing
authority.
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
an accrediting agency recognized by either of the following:
1. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its
successor.
2. The United States Department of Education.
(3) Fulfill a practice requirement, which shall be satisfied by demonstrating
completion of either of the following:
a. A period of postgraduate supervised clinical practice equal to a
minimum of 3,000 hours.
b. A minimum of two years of full-time postgraduate supervised clinical
practice.
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice requirements
which the Commission may determine by rule.
(c) An applicant for a master's category multistate license must meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by any of the
following:
a. Passage of a master's category qualifying national exam.
b. Licensure of the applicant in their home state at the master's category,
beginning prior to such time as a qualifying national exam was
required by the home state at the master's category and accompanied
by a period of continuous social work licensure thereafter, all of which
may be further governed by the rules of the Commission.
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by rule.
(2) Attain at least a master's degree in social work from a program that is both of
the following:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing
authority.
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
an accrediting agency recognized by either of the following:
1. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its
successor.
2. The United States Department of Education.
(d) An applicant for a bachelor's category multistate license must meet all of the
following requirements:
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 5

(1) Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by any of the
following:
a. Passage of a bachelor's category qualifying national exam.
b. Licensure of the applicant in their home state at the bachelor's
category, beginning prior to such time as a qualifying national exam
was required by the home state and accompanied by a period of
continuous social work licensure thereafter, all of which may be
further governed by the rules of the Commission.
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by rule.
(2) Attain at least a bachelor's degree in social work from a program that is both
of the following:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the licensing
authority.
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes accredited, by
an accrediting agency recognized by either of the following:
1. The Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or its
successor.
2. The United States Department of Education.
(e) The multistate license for a regulated social worker is subject to the renewal
requirements of the home state. The regulated social worker must maintain compliance with the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section to be eligible to renew a multistate license.
(f) The regulated social worker's services in a remote state are subject to that member
state's regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with due process and that member
state's laws, remove a regulated social worker's multistate authorization to practice in the remote
state for a specific period of time, impose fines, and take any other necessary actions to protect
the health and safety of its citizens.
(g) If a multistate license is encumbered, the regulated social worker's multistate
authorization to practice shall be deactivated in all remote states until the multistate license is no
longer encumbered.
(h) If a multistate authorization to practice is encumbered in a remote state, the regulated
social worker's multistate authorization to practice may be deactivated in that state until the
multistate authorization to practice is no longer encumbered.
"§ 90B-24. Issuance of a multistate license.
(a) Upon receipt of an application for multistate license, the home state licensing
authority shall determine the applicant's eligibility for a multistate license in accordance with this
Compact.
(b) If such applicant is eligible pursuant to G.S. 90B-23 of this Compact, the home state
licensing authority shall issue a multistate license that authorizes the applicant or regulated social
worker to practice in all member states under a multistate authorization to practice.
(c) Upon issuance of a multistate license, the home state licensing authority shall
designate whether the regulated social worker holds a multistate license in the bachelor's,
master's, or clinical category of social work.
(d) A multistate license issued by a home state to a resident in that state shall be
recognized by all Compact member states as authorizing social work practice under a multistate
authorization to practice corresponding to each category of licensure regulated in each member
state.
"§ 90B-25. Authority of Interstate Compact Commission and member state licensing
authorities.
(a) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations,
Page 6 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

or other rules related to the practice of social work in that state, where those laws, regulations, or
other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
(b) Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single state license.
(c) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse action against a
licensee's single state license to practice social work in that state.
(d) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse action against a
licensee's multistate authorization to practice in that state.
(e) Nothing in this Compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be construed to limit,
restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee's home state to take adverse action against
a licensee's multistate license based upon information provided by a remote state.
"§ 90B-26. Reissuance of a multistate license by a new home state.
(a) A licensee may hold a multistate license, issued by their home state, in only one
member state at any given time.
(b) If a licensee changes their home state by moving between two member states:
(1) The licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance of their multistate
license in their new home state. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees and
notify the prior home state in accordance with the rules of the Commission.
(2) Upon receipt of an application to reissue a multistate license, the new home
state shall verify that the multistate license is active, unencumbered, and
eligible for reissuance under the terms of the Compact and the rules of the
Commission. The multistate license issued by the prior home state will be
deactivated and all member states notified in accordance with the applicable
rules adopted by the Commission.
(3) Prior to the reissuance of the multistate license, the new home state shall
conduct procedures for considering the criminal history records of the
licensee. Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an
applicant's criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal
records.
(4) If required for initial licensure, the new home state may require completion of
jurisprudence requirements in the new home state.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if a licensee does not
meet the requirements set forth in this Compact for the reissuance of a
multistate license by the new home state, then the licensee shall be subject to
the new home state requirements for the issuance of a single state license in
that state.
(c) If a licensee changes their primary state of residence by moving from a member state
to a non-member state, or from a non-member state to a member state, then the licensee shall be
subject to the state requirements for the issuance of a single state license in the new home state.
(d) Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a licensee's ability to hold a single state
license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a licensee shall have only
one home state, and only one multistate license.
(e) Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single state license.
"§ 90B-27. Military families.
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 7

An active military member or their spouses shall designate a home state where the individual
has a multistate license. The individual may retain their home state designation during the period
the service member is on active duty.
"§ 90B-28. Adverse action.
(a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to do the following:
(1) Take adverse action against a regulated social worker's multistate
authorization to practice only within that member state, and issue subpoenas
for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony
of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a
licensing authority in a member state for the attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another member state shall be
enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according
to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in
proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any witness
fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes
of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
(2) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a
regulated social worker's multistate license.
(b) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine
appropriate action.
(c) The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a regulated social worker
who changes their home state during the course of the investigations. The home state shall also
have the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the administrator of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall
promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
(d) A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
regulated social worker the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
adverse action taken against that regulated social worker.
(e) A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of another
member state, provided that the member state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse
action.
(f) Joint investigations:
(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective social
work practice act or other applicable state law, any member state may
participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under
the Compact.
(g) If adverse action is taken by the home state against the multistate license of a regulated
social worker, the regulated social worker's multistate authorization to practice in all other
member states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate
license. All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against the license of a
regulated social worker shall include a statement that the regulated social worker's multistate
authorization to practice is deactivated in all member states until all conditions of the decision,
order, or agreement are satisfied.
(h) If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of
the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the home state and
all other member states of any adverse actions by remote states.
Page 8 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

(i) Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state's decision that participation in
an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. Nothing in this Compact shall
authorize a member state to demand the issuance of subpoenas for attendance and testimony of
witnesses or the production of evidence from another member state for lawful actions within that
member state.
(j) Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a member state to impose discipline against
a regulated social worker who holds a multistate authorization to practice for lawful actions
within another member state.
"§ 90B-29. Establishment of Social Work Licensure Compact Commission.
(a) Establishment. – The Compact member states hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the
Compact known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is an
instrumentality of the Compact states acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state.
The Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set
forth in this Article.
(b) Membership; Voting; Meetings. – Each member state shall have and be limited to one
delegate selected by that member state's licensing authority. The delegate shall be either (i) a
current member of the state licensing authority, who is a regulated social worker or public
member of the state licensing authority, or (ii) an administrator of the state licensing authority or
their designee. The Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates
and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits. The Commission may recommend removal or
suspension of any delegate from office. The member state licensing authority shall fill any
vacancy occurring in the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy. Each delegate shall be
entitled to one vote on all matters before the Commission requiring a vote by Commission
delegates.
A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws
may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other means of
communication. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by
telecommunication, video conference, or other similar electronic means.
(c) Powers; Duties. – The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest policies.
(2) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission.
(3) Establish and amend rules and bylaws.
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's rules, and the bylaws.
(6) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent
to do so on the Commission's behalf.
(7) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue
or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected.
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
(9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a member state.
(10) Conduct an annual financial review.
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 9

relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters.
(12) Assess and collect fees.
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources
of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and receive, utilize,
and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid
any appearance of impropriety and conflict of interest.
(14) Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own,
hold, improve, or use, any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided
interest therein.
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed.
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
(17) Borrow money.
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact and the bylaws.
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies.
(20) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair and vice-chair.
(21) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the
model Compact language such that the State would not qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(22) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
(d) Executive Committee. – The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
(1) The Executive Committee shall be composed of 11 members, as follows:
a. The chair and vice-chair of the Commission shall be voting members
of the Executive Committee.
b. Five voting members who are elected by the Commission from the
current membership of the Commission.
c. Up to four ex officio, nonvoting members from four recognized
national social work organizations, selected by their respective
organizations.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
provided in the bylaws.
(4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
(5) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Executive Committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided
by this Article. The Executive Committee shall give seven days' notice of its
meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to persons
with an interest in the business of the Commission. The Executive Committee
may hold a special meeting in accordance with this Article.
(6) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of the Compact. The Executive
Committee shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact,
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
Page 10 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

Compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed
necessary.
b. Recommend to the Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact member
states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees.
c. Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract.
d. Prepare and recommend the budget.
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission.
f. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and provide
compliance reports to the Commission.
g. Establish additional committees as necessary.
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers
and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw.
i. Perform other duties as provided in rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
(e) Meetings of the Commission. – All meetings shall be open to the public, and public
notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions
in G.S. 90B-31. The Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to conduct
emergency business by giving 48 hours' notice to all commissioners, on the Commission's
website, and other means as provided in the Commission's rules. The Commission's legal counsel
shall certify that the Commission's need to meet qualifies as an emergency. The Commission or
the Executive Committee or other committees of the Commission may convene in a closed,
nonpublic meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the
Commission must receive legal advice or discuss any of the following:
(1) Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact.
(2) The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices, or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the
Commission's internal personnel practices and procedures.
(3) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation.
(4) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
real estate.
(5) Accusation of any person of a crime or formally censuring any person.
(6) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential.
(7) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
(8) Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes.
(9) Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or
on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant
to the Compact.
(10) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state
statute.
(11) Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Commission or by a
member state's licensing authority.
(12) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the Commission's
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and shall reference each relevant
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 11

exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes. The Commission shall
keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide
a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description
of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified
in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject
to release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(f) Financing of the Commission. – The Commission shall pay, or provide for the
payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations, and grants of
money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state and
impose fees on other licensees of member states to whom it grants a multistate license to cover
the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total
amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved by the Commission each year for which
revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be
allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall be promulgated
by rule. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts
and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report
of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
(g) Qualified Immunity; Defense; Indemnification. – The members, officers, executive
director, employees, and representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such
person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, or
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope
of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel at their own expense; and
provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director,
employee, or representative of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable
state laws. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a member
state's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law
or regulation. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity
by the member states or by the Commission.
"§ 90B-30. Data system.
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and
utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action,
and the presence of current significant investigative information on all licensed individuals in
member states.
(b) The Commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate license a unique
identifier, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state shall
submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this Compact is
applicable, as required by the rules of the Commission, including all of the following:
(1) Identifying information.
(2) Licensure data.
(3) Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto.
(4) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the
beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation not made confidential under member state law.
(5) Any denial of application for licensure and the reasons for such denial.
(6) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact, as
determined by the rules of the Commission.
(7) Current significant investigative information.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this Compact or
through the data system, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
the authenticated business records of the Commission and shall be entitled to any associated
hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a
member state.
(e) Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member
state will only be available to other member states. It is the responsibility of the member states
to report any adverse action against a licensee and to monitor the database to determine whether
adverse action has been taken against a licensee. Adverse action information pertaining to a
licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
(f) Member states contributing information to the data system may designate information
that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of the contributing state.
(g) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently required to be
expunged by federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the information shall be
removed from the data system.
"§ 90B-31. Rulemaking.
(a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to achieve the purposes
of the Compact effectively and efficiently. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the
Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
(b) The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each member state,
provided, however, that where the rules of the Commission conflict with the laws of the member
state that establish the member state's laws, regulations, and applicable standards that govern the
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 13

practice of social work as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the Commission
shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
(c) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth
in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day following
adoption or the date specified in the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or a portion of a
rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within
four years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect
in any member state.
(e) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a public hearing and
allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to promulgation and adoption of rule by the Commission, and at least 30 days
in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed
rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking (i) on the website of the
Commission or other publicly accessible platform, (ii) to persons who have requested notice of
the Commission's notices of proposed rulemaking, and (iii) in such other ways as the Commission
may, by rule, specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of the following:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission
will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the proposed
time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered
and voted upon.
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to
the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking.
(3) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed
rule.
(4) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person.
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments and
documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed rule shall be available to the
public.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
(k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the
proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive changes
not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in this section, the effective date of the
rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice that it adopted or
amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with 48 hours' notice, with opportunity for comment, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall be retroactively
Page 14 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective
date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted
immediately in order to (i) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare, (ii)
prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds, (iii) meet a deadline for the promulgation
of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule, or (iv) protect public health
and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors
in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be
posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any
person for a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds
that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and
delivered to the Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the
revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not
take effect without the approval of the Commission.
(n) No member state's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
"§ 90B-32. Oversight; dispute resolution; enforcement.
(a) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall
enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper and judicial
proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission
may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or
any such similar matter.
(c) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding
regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene
in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the Commission
shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated rules.
(d) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the
Commission shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the
nature of default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other
action to be taken by the Commission.
(2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(e) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of delegates of the member states, and
all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(f) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state's legislature, the defaulting state's state licensing authority and each of the
member states' state licensing authority. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 15

(g) Upon the termination of a state's membership from this Compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated
state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
six months after the date of said notice of termination.
(h) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default
or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting state.
(i) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(j) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise among member states and between member and nonmember
states. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute
resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(k) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the U.S. District Court
for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices
against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and
its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and
damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or the defaulting member state's law.
(l) A member state may initiate legal action in the U.S. District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices against the
Commission to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules
and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(m) No person other than a member state shall enforce this Compact against the
Commission.
"§ 90B-33. Effective date; withdrawal; amendment.
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven member states
(charter member states) to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is
materially different than the model Compact statute.
(b) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the
model Compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in this Article. If any
member state is found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the
Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
of member states should be less than seven.
(c) Member states enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial charter member
states shall be subject to the process set forth in this Article to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation
in the Compact.
(d) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically
repudiated by the Commission.
Page 16 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231

(e) Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's initial adoption of
the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes
law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the
full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.
(f) Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same. A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of
the repealing statute. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting
requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Upon the enactment of a statute
withdrawing from this Compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to
all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of six months after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
(g) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember
state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
(h) This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all
member states.
"§ 90B-34. Construction and severability.
This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as
to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions
of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be
construed to limit the Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision
of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of
any member state, a state seeking participation in the Compact, or the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
Notwithstanding this section, the Commission may deny a state's participation in the Compact
or, in accordance with the requirements of this Article, terminate a member state's participation
in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material
departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the
remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all
severable matters.
"§ 90B-35. Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws.
A licensee providing services in a remote state under a multistate authorization to practice
shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including laws, regulations, and applicable standards, of
the remote state where the client is located at the time care is rendered. Nothing herein prevents
the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the
Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. All permissible agreements between the
Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms."
House Bill 231 Session Law 2025-7 Page 17

SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 12th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 8:21 a.m. this 13th day of June, 2025
Page 18 Session Law 2025-7 House Bill 231